Arkansas, session 2025, HB1537.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 9-28-402(12)(F), concerning the definition
of "exempt child welfare agency" within the Child Welfare Agency Licensing
Act, is amended to read as follows:
(F) Human development centers regulated by the Board of
Developmental Disabilities Services pursuant to the Location Act for
Community Homes for Individuals with Intellectual and Developmental
Disabilities, § 20-48-601 et seq.;

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 48, Subchapter 6, is
repealed.
Subchapter 6 — Location Act for Community Homes for Individuals with
Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities

20-48-601. Title.
This subchapter shall be known as the “Location Act for Community Homes
for Individuals with Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities”.
*JMB166*
02/20/2025 9:07:29 AM JMB166

HB1537

20-48-602. Purpose.
(a) The General Assembly declares that it is the goal of this
subchapter to improve the quality of life of all individuals with
intellectual or other developmental disabilities and to integrate individuals
with intellectual or other developmental disabilities into the mainstream of
society by ensuring them the availability of community residential
opportunities in the residential areas of this state.
(b) In order to implement this goal, this subchapter should be
liberally construed toward that end.

20-48-603. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) “Individual with an intellectual and developmental
disability” means a person with an intellectual and developmental disability
as defined in this section;
(2) “Intellectual and developmental disability” means the same
as defined in § 20-48-101;
(3) “Division” means the Division of Developmental Disabilities
Services or the staff of the division where the context so indicates;
(4) “Family Home I” means a community-based residential home
licensed by the division that provides room and board, personal care,
habilitation services, and supervision in a single-family environment for not
more than eight (8) individuals with developmental disabilities;
(5) “Family Home II” means a community-based residential home
licensed by the division that provides room and board, personal care,
habilitation services, and supervision in a multifamily environment for more
than eight (8) but fewer than sixteen (16) individuals with developmental
disabilities;
(6) “Permitted use” means a use by right that is authorized in
residential zoning districts; and
(7) “Political subdivision” means a county or municipal
corporation and includes any boards, commissions, or councils governing land
use on behalf of the political subdivision.

20-48-604. Zoning — Permitted use.
02/20/2025 9:07:29 AM JMB166

HB1537
(a) A Family Home I is a residential use of property for the purposes
of zoning and shall be treated as a permitted use in all residential zones or
districts, including all single-family residential zones or districts of all
political subdivisions. No political subdivision may require that a Family
Home I or its owner or operator obtain a conditional use permit, special use
permit, special exception, or variance.
(b) A Family Home II is a multifamily residential use of a property
for the purpose of zoning and shall be treated as a permitted use in all
zoning districts of all political subdivisions allowing multifamily uses. No
political subdivision may require that a Family Home II or its owner or
operator obtain a conditional use permit, special use permit, special
exception, or variance.

20-48-605. Issuance and renewal of licenses.
(a) For the purposes of safeguarding the health and safety of
individuals with intellectual or other developmental disabilities and
avoiding over-concentration of Family Homes I and Family Homes II, either
alone or in conjunction with similar community-based residences, the Division
of Developmental Disabilities Services shall inspect and license the
operation of family homes and may renew or revoke their licenses.
(b) A license is valid for one (1) year from the date it is issued or
renewed although the division may inspect the homes more frequently, if
needed.
(c) The division shall not issue or renew and may revoke the license
of a family home not operating in compliance with this section and rules
adopted hereunder.

20-48-606. Rules — Density control.
(a) The Division of Developmental Disabilities Services shall
promulgate rules pursuant to the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-
15-201 et seq., which shall encompass the following matters:
(1)(A) Limits on the number of new Family Homes I and Family
Homes II to be permitted on blocks, block faces, and other appropriate
geographic areas taking into account the existing residential population
density and the number, occupancy, and location of similar community
residential facilities serving persons in drug, alcohol, juvenile, child,
02/20/2025 9:07:29 AM JMB166

HB1537
parole, and other treatment programs as well as any other dissimilar
facilities such as public housing, soup kitchens at churches, and boarding
homes.
(B) Density limits as follows:
City Population Total Number of Homes I and II
1,000 or fewer 1
1,001 — 9,999 1 for every 2,000
10,000 — 49,000 1 for every 3,000
50,000 — 249,000 1 for every 10,000
250,000 — 1 for every 20,000
(C) There shall be three hundred feet (300′) between family
homes unless otherwise permitted by local ordinance. There shall be three
thousand feet (3,000′) between family homes in cities over thirty thousand
(30,000) population unless otherwise permitted by local ordinance;
(2) Assurance that adequate arrangements are made for the
residents of family homes to receive such care and habilitation as are
necessary and appropriate to their needs and to further their progress
towards independent living and that they have access to appropriate services
such as public transportation, health care, recreation facilities, and
shopping centers;
(3) Protection of the health and safety of the residents of
Family Homes I and Family Homes II, however, compliance with these rules
shall not relieve the owner or operator of any Family Home I or Family Home
II of the obligation to comply with the requirements or standards of a
political subdivision pertaining to setback, lot size, flood zones, outside
appearance, building, housing, health, fire, safety, and motor vehicle
parking space that generally apply to single-family residences in the zoning
district for Family Homes I or multifamily use districts for Family Homes II.
No requirements for business licenses, gross receipt taxes, environmental
impact studies, or clearances may be imposed on the homes if those fees,
taxes, or clearances are not imposed on all structures in the zoning district
housing a like number of persons; and
(4)(A) Procedures by which any resident of a residential zoning
district or the governing body of a political subdivision in which a Family
Home I or Family Home II is or is to be located may petition the division to
deny an application for a license to operate a Family Home I or Family Home
02/20/2025 9:07:29 AM JMB166

HB1537
II on the grounds that the operation of the home would be in violation of the
limits established pursuant to subdivision (a)(1)(A) or subdivision (a)(1)(B)
of this section or that the proposed location is an area of high risk to the
health and safety of the residents of the family home.
(B) Petitions claiming the high-risk-area basis for denial
must set forth and document one (1) or more of the following high-risk
rationales:
(i) High crime area;
(ii) Close proximity to stored hazardous materials;
(iii) Dangerous traffic pattern;
(iv) Frequent flooding; or
(v) Insufficient fire protection.
(b) The division shall furnish a copy of proposed rules promulgated
hereunder to the Arkansas Municipal League, the Association of Arkansas
Counties, and the Capitol Zoning District Commission at least thirty (30)
days before the public hearing to be held thereon.

20-48-607. Application for license.
(a) All applicants for a license to operate a Family Home I or Family
Home II shall apply to the Division of Developmental Disabilities Services
for the license and shall file a copy of the application with the governing
body of the political subdivision having jurisdiction over the zoning of the
land on which the Family Home I or Family Home II is to be located.
(b) Notice of the application shall be sent by mail addressed to the
resident as listed in the city directory or occupant of all buildings located
within two hundred feet (200′) of the proposed site.
(c)(1) All applicants shall post a sign not less than twelve inches by
eighteen inches (12″ x 18″) at the site.
(2) The sign shall contain such statements as required by rules
promulgated pursuant to this subchapter.
(d) All applications must include population and occupancy statistics
reflecting compliance with the limits established pursuant to § 20-48-
606(a)(1)(A) and (B).
(e) The division may not issue a license for a family home until the
applicant has submitted proof of filing with the governing body of the
political subdivision having jurisdiction over the zoning of the land on
02/20/2025 9:07:29 AM JMB166

HB1537
which the home is to be located a copy of the application at least thirty
(30) days before the granting of the license and any amendment of the
application increasing the number of residents to be served at least fifteen
(15) days before the granting of a license.

20-48-608. List of family homes.
In order to facilitate the implementation of § 20-48-606(a)(1)(A) and
(B), the Division of Developmental Disabilities Services of the Department of
Human Services shall maintain a list of the location, capacity, and current
occupancy of all Family Homes I and Family Homes II. The division shall
ensure that this list shall not contain the names or other identifiable
information about any residents of the homes and that copies of this list
shall be available to any resident of this state and any state agency or
political subdivision upon request.

20-48-609. Comprehensive plans.
(a) Any political subdivision which currently has zoning restrictions
or hereafter adopts zoning restrictions may develop a comprehensive plan for
providing adequate sites for Family Homes I and Family Homes II and submit
the plan to the Division of Developmental Disabilities Services of the
Department of Human Services along with population and occupancy statistics
reflecting compliance with the limits established pursuant to § 20-48-
606(a)(1)(A) and (B).
(b) The plan may also delineate unsuitable sites due to high risks set
forth in § 20-48-606(4).
(c) The division shall thereafter consult the comprehensive plan filed
by the political subdivision in considering licensure of Family Homes I and
Family Homes II for that political subdivision.

20-48-610. Compliance with appearance or structural requirements in
certain districts.
Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed as relieving the owner or
operator of any Family Home I or Family Home II of the obligation to comply
with outside appearance requirements or structural requirements for location
of a Family Home I or Family Home II within a local historic district or
within the Capitol Zoning District.
02/20/2025 9:07:29 AM JMB166

HB1537

20-48-611. Restriction by private property agreement void.
(a) Any restriction, reservation, condition, exception, or covenant in
any subdivision plan, deed, or other instrument of or pertaining to the
transfer, sale, lease, or use of property that would permit residential use
of property but prohibit the use of the property as a Family Home I or Family
Home II for individuals with intellectual or other developmental
disabilities, to the extent of the prohibition, shall be void as against the
public policy of this state and shall be given no legal or equitable force or
effect.
(b) Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed directly or
analogously to affect the rights of property owners to exclude by express or
judicially implied agreements other property uses which are not the subject
of this subchapter.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 20-48-702(a)(2), concerning the
reimbursement rate structure for contracting with community programs, is
amended to read as follows:
(2) By January 1, 2002, the department will design and conduct a
rate and cost-of-service review of the reasonable and efficient prospective
costs necessarily incurred to provide Medicaid-covered and state-covered
services within the community to individuals with developmental disabilities.
Subject to federal and state funding restrictions, the department will fund
Medicaid services for persons with developmental disabilities in accordance
with findings contained in the review and provide state funds for those
services to which the individuals are entitled under federal and state laws
that are not covered by the Medicaid program. By June 30, 2002, the
department will adopt regulations and standards, approved pursuant to this
subchapter, which clearly define the state's responsibility to individuals
eligible for services under federal laws, including, but not limited to, the
Americans With Disabilities Act of 1990, Pub. L. No. 101-336; Section 504 of
the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, Pub. L. No. 93-112; and state laws, including
§§ 20-14-502, and 20-48-101, and 20-48-603, and more specifically:
(A) The categories of services and service limits on each
category which will be provided through the Medicaid state plan; and
(B) The categories of services and service limits which
02/20/2025 9:07:29 AM JMB166

HB1537
will be provided with state general revenue funds or funds that are
applicable for provider client services, or both.


































02/20/2025 9:07:29 AM JMB166